Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1590.01
Licensed facility operator, defined.

Licensed facility operator shall mean any person or entity who has obtained a license under the Low-Level Radioactive Waste Disposal Act to operate a facility, including any person or entity to whom an assignment of a license is approved by the department.

Laws 1996, LB 1201, § 5.